New York, session 2025-2026, A4354.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 725 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 725. Reduction of cost of textbooks and course materials. 1. Every 4 institution of higher education as defined in this article is authorized 5 to adopt policies that allow the use of innovative pricing techniques 6 and payment options for textbooks, supplemental materials, and other 7 course materials or textbooks in accordance with 34 CFR 668.164(c)(2). 8 2. Policies adopted pursuant to subdivision one of this section may 9 include, but are not limited to, bulk pricing arrangements that enable 10 students to purchase textbooks or other instructional materials that are 11 delivered: (a) digitally; (b) through technology that is required to be 12 used within a course; or (c) in print format. 13 3. Innovative pricing techniques and payment options adopted pursuant 14 to this section shall include an opt-out provision for students. 15 4. Innovative pricing techniques and payment options adopted pursuant 16 to this section shall be adopted only if there is documented evidence 17 that the proposed options would result in the textbooks or other 18 instructional materials being made available to students at below 19 competitive market rates. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08789-01-5